da: Cajonens krops-/skalmateriale: Baltisk birk; Bøg; Birk; Komposit; MDF/HDF (konstruktionstræ); Mahogni; Ahorn; Eg; Okoume; Krydsfiner (uspecificeret); Poppel; Valnød; Andet
ja: カホン本体／シェル素材: バルティックバーチ; ビーチ; バーチ; コンポジット; MDF/HDF (エンジニアードウッド); マホガニー; メープル; オーク; オクメ; 合板 (指定なし); ポプラ; ウォールナット; その他
pt-PT: Material do corpo/concha do cajon: Bétula do Báltico; Faia; Bétula; Compósito; MDF/HDF (madeira processada); Mogno; Ácer; Carvalho; Okoumé; Contraplacado (não especificado); Choupo; Nogueira; Outro
ko: 카혼 본체/쉘 재질: 발트 자작나무; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 복합재; MDF/HDF(공학 목재); 마호가니; 단풍나무; 참나무; 오쿠메; 합판(미지정); 포플러; 호두나무; 기타
hu: Cajón testének/házának anyaga: Balti nyír; Bükk; Nyír; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (mesterséges fa); Mahagóni; Juhar; Tölgy; Okoumé; Rétegelt lemez (nem specifikált); Nyárfa; Diófa; Egyéb
fr: Matériau du corps/de la caisse du cajón: Bouleau de la Baltique; Hêtre; Bouleau; Composite; MDF/HDF (bois d’ingénierie); Acajou; Érable; Chêne; Okoumé; Contreplaqué (non spécifié); Peuplier; Noyer; Autre
sl-SI: Material telesa/korpusa cajona: Baltska breza; Bukev; Breza; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (tehnični les); Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Okoume; Vezana plošča (neopredeljeno); Topol; Oreh; Drugo
lt-LT: Cajon korpuso medžiaga: Baltijos beržas; Bukas; Beržas; Kompozitas; MDF / HDF (inžinerinė mediena); Raudonmedis; Klevas; Ąžuolas; Okumė; Fanera (nenurodyta); Tuopa; Riešutmedis; Kita
de: Material des Cajón-Korpus bzw. -Gehäuses: Ostseebirke; Buche; Birke; Verbundwerkstoff; MDF/HDF (Holzwerkstoff); Mahagoni; Ahorn; Eiche; Okoumé; Sperrholz (unspezifiziert); Pappel; Walnuss; Sonstige
cs: Materiál těla/korpusu cajonu: Baltská bříza; Buk; Bříza; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (umělé dřevo); Mahagon; Javor; Dub; Okoumé; Překližka (nespecifikováno); Topol; Ořech; Jiné
vi: Chất liệu thân/vỏ Cajon: Gỗ phong vàng Baltic; Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ phong vàng; Composite; MDF/HDF (gỗ kỹ thuật); Gỗ gụ; Gỗ phong; Gỗ sồi; Gỗ okoume; Ván ép (không xác định); Gỗ dương; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
pt-BR: Material do corpo/revestimento do cajon: Bétula báltica; Faia; Bétula; Material compósito; MDF/HDF (madeira projetada); Mogno; Maple; Carvalho; Okoumé; Compensado (não especificado); Álamo; Nogueira; Outro
bg-BG: Материал на тялото/корпуса на кахона: Балтийска бреза; Бук; Бреза; Композитен материал; MDF/HDF (инженерна дървесина); Махагон; Клен; Дъб; Окуме; Шперплат (неуточнено); Топола; Орех; Други
es: Material del cuerpo o carcasa del cajón: Abedul báltico; Haya; Abedul; Compuesto; MDF/HDF (madera técnica); Caoba; Arce; Roble; Okoume; Madera contrachapada (sin especificar); Álamo; Nogal; Otro
el: Υλικό σώματος/κελύφους cajon: Σημύδα Βαλτικής; Οξιά; Σημύδα; Σύνθετο υλικό; MDF/HDF (τεχνητή ξυλεία); Μαόνι; Σφένδαμος; Δρυς; Okoume; Κόντρα πλακέ (μη καθορισμένο); Λεύκα; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
nl: Cajon body/shell materiaal: Baltisch berken; Beuken; Berken; Composiet; MDF/HDF (bewerkt hout); Mahonie; Esdoorn; Eiken; Okoumé; Multiplex (niet gespecificeerd); Populieren; Notenhout; Overig
nb: Cajonkropp/skallmateriale: Baltisk bjørk; Bøk; Bjørk; Kompositt; MDF/HDF (konstruert tre); Mahogni; Lønn; Eik; Okoume; Kryssfiner (uspesifisert); Poppel; Valnøtt; Annet
en: Cajon body/shell material: Baltic birch; Beech; Birch; Composite; MDF/HDF (engineered wood); Mahogany; Maple; Oak; Okoume; Plywood (unspecified); Poplar; Walnut; Other
zh-CN: 卡洪鼓的鼓身/鼓壳材质: 波罗的海桦木; 榉木; 桦木; 复合材料; MDF/HDF（工程木）; 桃花心木; 枫木; 橡木; 奥古曼木; 胶合板（未指定）; 杨木; 胡桃木; 其他
tr: Cajon gövde/kasa malzemesi: Baltık huş ağacı; Kayın; Huş ağacı; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (işlenmiş ahşap); Maun; Akçaağaç; Meşe; Okume; Kontrplak (belirtilmemiş); Kavak; Ceviz; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál tela/obalu cajonu: Baltská breza; Buk; Breza; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (technické drevo); Mahagón; Javor; Dub; Okoume; Preglejka (nešpecifikované); Topoľ; Orech; Iné
it: Materiale del corpo/guscio del Cajon: Betulla baltica; Faggio; Betulla; Composito; MDF/HDF (legno composito); Mogano; Acero; Rovere; Okoumè; Compensato (non specificato); Pioppo; Noce; Altro
hr-HR: Materijal tijela/školjke Cajona: Baltička breza; Bukva; Breza; Kompozit; MDF/HDF (konstrukcijsko drvo); Mahagonij; Javor; Hrast; Okoume; Šperploča (neodređeno); Topola; Orah; Ostalo
ru: Материал корпуса кахона: Балтийская береза; Бук; Береза; Композит; МДФ / ХДФ; Махагони; Клен; Дуб; Окуме; Фанера (без уточнения); Тополь; Орех; Другое
zh-TW: 木箱鼓鼓身/鼓肚材質: 波羅的海樺木; 櫸木; 樺木; 複合材質; MDF/HDF (工程木材); 桃花心木; 楓木; 橡木; 奧古曼木; 膠合板 (未指定); 白楊木; 胡桃木; 其他
th: วัสดุตัวกลอง/เปลือกกลองคาฮอง: ไม้เบิร์ชบอลติก; ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; คอมโพสิต; MDF/HDF (ไม้เอนจิเนียร์); ไม้มะฮอกกานี; ไม้เมเปิล; ไม้โอ๊ก; ไม้โอกูเม่; ไม้อัด (ไม่ระบุ); ไม้ป็อปลาร์; ไม้วอลนัต; อื่นๆ
pl: Materiał korpusu/skorupy cajonu: Brzoza bałtycka; Buk; Brzoza; Kompozyt; MDF/HDF (płyta drewnopochodna); Mahoń; Klon; Dąb; Okoume; Sklejka (nieokreślona); Topola; Orzech; Inne
sv: Cajonkropp/skalmaterial: Baltisk björk; Bok; Björk; Komposit; MDF/HDF (konstruerat trä); Mahogny; Lönn; Ek; Okoumé; Plywood (ospecificerad); Poppel; Valnöt; Övrigt
fi: Cajonin rungon/kuoren materiaali: Baltian koivu; Pyökki; Koivu; Komposiitti; MDF/HDF (kuitulevy); Mahonki; Vaahtera; Tammi; Okoumé; Vaneri (määrittelemätön); Poppeli; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
ro-RO: Materialul corpului/carcasei cajonului: Mesteacăn baltic; Fag; Mesteacăn; Compozit; MDF/HDF (lemn prelucrat); Mahon; Arțar; Stejar; Okoume; Placaj (nespecificat); Plop; Nuc; Altele